Massachusetts, session 194th, H5603.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding subsection (b) of section 13 of chapter 4 of the General 
Laws, wherever the town of Stow or its subdivisions, committees, boards, commissions or 
offices are required by statute, ordinance, by-law or judicial order to publish a legal notice in a 
newspaper or newspaper of general circulation, such requirement may be met through 1 or more 
of the following means: 
(i) a print newspaper of local or general circulation; 
(ii) the website of a newspaper of local or general circulation; 
(iii) websites reporting local news and opinion that satisfy all criteria for digital 
publication as set forth in subsection (c) of said section 13 of said chapter 4; 
(iv) a statewide website that is maintained as a repository for such notices; or 
(v) a town-wide website that is maintained as a repository for such notices. 

of 2 12  SECTION 2. Nothing set forth in this act shall be construed to alter or amend the time or 
timing of publication of legal notices set forth in the General Laws. 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.